Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2996.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-107.1 of Title 47, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Electronic format" shall have the same meaning as in
Section 1105A of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes and in a manner
approved by Service Oklahoma; and
2. "Eligible entity" means a firm or person who is authorized
to act on behalf of an automobile dealer, used motor vehicle
auction, rental car agency, salvage pool, lender or lienholder, or
any other entity or class authorized by Service Oklahoma.

Req. No. 14346 Page 1

B. Any records submitted in an electronic format to Service
Oklahoma by an eligible entity shall not require notarization and
shall be exempt from any notarization requirements pursuant to Title
47 of the Oklahoma Statutes. This subsection shall also apply to
any records being submitted to Service Oklahoma to create an
electronic format document, including, but not limited to, vehicle
titling or registration.
C. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
transactions that do not include an eligible entity.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14346 JBH 12/18/25












Req. No. 14346 Page 2